Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 5.5 COLORADO NOXIOUS WEED ACT
35-5.5-109. Private lands - management of noxious weeds - charges.

The local governing body, through its delegates, agents, and employees, shall have the right to enter upon any premises, lands, or places, whether public or private, during reasonable business hours for the purpose of inspecting for the existence of noxious weed infestations, when at least one of the following circumstances has occurred:

The landowner or occupant has requested an inspection;

A neighboring landowner or occupant has reported a suspected noxious weed infestation and requested an inspection; or

An authorized agent of the local government has made a visual observation from a public right-of-way or area and has reason to believe that a noxious weed infestation exists.

No entry upon any premises, lands, or places shall be permitted until the landowner or occupant has been notified by certified mail that such inspection is pending. Where possible, inspections shall be scheduled and conducted with the concurrence of the landowner or occupant.

If after receiving notice that an inspection is pending the landowner or occupant denies access to the inspector of the local governing body, the inspector may seek an inspection warrant issued by a municipal, county, or district court having jurisdiction over the land. The court shall issue an inspection warrant upon presentation by the local governing body, through its agent or employee, of an affidavit stating: The information which gives the inspector reasonable cause to believe that any provision of this article is being or has been violated; that the occupant or landowner has denied access to the inspector; and a general description of the location of the affected land. No landowner or occupant shall deny access to such land when presented with an inspection warrant.

The local governing body of the county or municipality having jurisdiction over private lands upon which noxious weeds are found shall have the authority, acting directly or indirectly through its agent or staff, to notify the landowner or occupant of such lands, advising the landowner or occupant of the presence of noxious weeds. Said notice shall name the noxious weeds, advise the landowner or occupant to manage the noxious weeds, and specify the best available control methods of integrated management. Where possible, the local governing body shall consult with the affected landowner or occupant in the development of a plan for the management of noxious weeds on the premises or lands.

Within a reasonable time after receipt of notification, which at no time shall exceed ten days, the landowner or occupant shall either:

Comply with the terms of the notification;

Acknowledge the terms of the notification and submit an acceptable plan and schedule for the completion of the plan for compliance; or

Request an arbitration panel to determine the final management plan.

The arbitration panel selected by the local governing body shall be comprised of a weed management specialist or weed scientist, a landowner of similar land in the same county, and a third panel member chosen by agreement of the first two panel members. The landowner or occupant shall be entitled to challenge any one member of the panel, and the local governing body shall name a new panel member from the same category. The decision of the arbitration panel shall be final.

In the event the landowner or occupant fails to comply with the notice to manage the identified noxious weeds or implement the plan developed by the arbitration panel, the local governing body has the authority to:

Provide for and compel the management of such noxious weeds at such time, upon such notice, and in such manner as the local governing body shall prescribe by ordinance or resolution; and

Assess the whole cost thereof, including up to twenty percent for inspection and other incidental costs in connection therewith, upon the lot or tract of land where the noxious weeds are located; except that no local governing body shall levy a tax lien against land it administers as part of a public right-of-way. Such assessment shall be a lien against each lot or tract of land until paid and shall have priority over all other liens except general taxes and prior special assessments. Such assessment may be certified to the county treasurer of the county in which the property is located and collected and paid over in the same manner as provided for the collection of taxes. Any funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the local governing body's weed fund or any similar fund.

No local governing body shall provide for or compel the management of noxious weeds on private property pursuant to this subsection (5) without first applying the same or greater management measures to any land or rights-of-way owned or administered by the local governing body that are adjacent to the private property.

No local governing body shall assess the cost of providing for or compelling the management of noxious weeds on private property until the level of management called for in the notice or the management plan developed by the arbitration panel has been successfully achieved.

The local governing body, through its delegates, agents, and employees, shall have the right to enter upon any premises, lands, or places, whether public or private, during reasonable business hours for the purpose of ensuring compliance with the requirements of this article concerning noxious weed management and any other local requirements.

No agent, employee, or delegate of a local governing body shall have a civil cause of action against a landowner or occupant for personal injury or property damage incurred while on public or private land for purposes consistent with this article except when such damages were willfully or deliberately caused by the landowner.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1554, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1), (2)(a), (3), (5), and (6) amended, p. 770, § 11, effective May 23.

35-5.5-110. Public lands - control of undesirable plants - charges.

It is the duty of each state board, department, or agency that administers or supervises state lands to manage noxious weeds on any lands under its jurisdiction using the methods prescribed by the local governing body in whose jurisdiction such state lands are located. The local governing body may give notice to any such state board, department, or agency advising of the presence of noxious weeds and naming them. Such notice shall specify the best available methods of integrated management that are not in conflict with federal law or contractual restrictions included in federal land conveyances to the state. Wherever possible, the local governing body shall consult with the affected state board, department, or agency in the development of a plan for the management of noxious weeds on the premises or lands.

Within a reasonable time after receipt of notification, which at no time shall exceed ten days, the state board, department, or agency shall do one of the following:

Comply with the terms of the notification;

Acknowledge the terms of the notification and submit an acceptable plan and schedule for the completion of the plan for compliance;

Request an arbitration panel to determine the final management plan.

The arbitration panel selected by the local governing body shall be comprised of a weed management specialist or weed scientist, a landowner of similar land in the same county, and a third panel member chosen by agreement of the first two panel members. The state board, department, or agency shall be entitled to challenge any one member of the panel, and the local governing body shall name a new panel member from the same category. The decision of the arbitration panel shall be final.

In the event the state board, department, or agency fails to comply with the notice to manage the identified noxious weeds or implement the plan developed by the arbitration panel, the local governing body in whose jurisdiction the infestation is located may enter upon such lands and undertake the management of such noxious weeds or cause the same to be done, the expense thereof to be a proper charge against said state board, department, or agency which has jurisdiction over the lands. An agreement for payment shall be reached within two weeks after the date such an expense is submitted, with respect to the amount of reimbursement to be paid. Such agreement shall be in writing. If no agreement has been reached and if the charge is not immediately paid, such charge shall be submitted to the controller, who shall treat such amount as an encumbrance on the budget of the state board, department, or agency involved, or such charge may be recovered in any court with jurisdiction over such lands. Any state board, department, or agency may enter into a contract with the local governing body to authorize the management of noxious weeds on state-administered land on terms and conditions satisfactory to both parties.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (3) of this section, the division shall enter into agreements with local governing bodies for the control of weeds on any property the division owns in fee title or has effective surface control over pursuant to a long-term lease or easement agreement. For purposes of this subsection (4) and subsection (5) of this section, "long-term lease or easement agreement" means any lease or easement agreement that exceeds ten years. Agreements between the division and local governing bodies for weed control shall describe the terms and conditions of weed control, provide an annual estimated budget for such weed control, and identify specific weed control responsibilities for the division and the property owner, if different than the division. Weed control agreements required pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be executed on or before July 1, 1997.

Any weed control expense incurred by a local governing body pursuant to subsection (3) of this section on any lands held by the division in fee title or by long-term lease or easement agreement, as described in subsection (4) of this section, and for which a weed control agreement as described in subsection (4) of this section has been signed, and which costs are in accordance with that long-term agreement, shall be deemed correct and final and shall be paid by the division pursuant to section 33-1-110 (6.5), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1556, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 772, § 12, effective May 23; (3) amended and (4) and (5) added, p. 1370, § 3, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (3) by House Bill 96-1008 and House Bill 96-1014 were harmonized.

35-5.5-111. Cooperation with federal and state agencies.

The local governing bodies of all counties and municipalities in this state are hereby authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with federal and state agencies for the integrated management of noxious weeds within their respective territorial jurisdictions.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1557, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 772, § 13, effective May 23.

35-5.5-112. Public rights-of-way - management of noxious weeds - charges.

It shall be the duty of each local governing body and each state board, department, or agency to confirm that all public roads, public highways, public rights-of-way, and any easements appurtenant thereto, under the jurisdiction of each such entity, are in compliance with this article, and any violations of this article shall be the financial responsibility of the appropriate local governing body or state board, department, or agency.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1557, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 772, § 14, effective May 23.

35-5.5-113. Public nuisance - abatement.

All noxious weeds, at any and all stages, their carriers, and any and all premises, plants, and things infested or exposed to infestation therewith may be declared to be a public nuisance by the local governing body having jurisdiction over the lands upon which said noxious weeds are situated. Once declared, such nuisances are subject to all laws and remedies relating to the prevention and abatement of nuisances. The local governing body, in a summary manner or otherwise, may take such action, including removal and destruction, with reference to such nuisance as in its discretion appears necessary. The remedies of this section shall be in addition to all other remedies provided by law.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1557, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 773, § 15, effective May 23.

35-5.5-114. Review of compliance on federal land. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1557, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 12, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

35-5.5-114.1. Survey of compliance on federal land.

On or before January 1, 1998, the state weed coordinator shall survey those counties that include significant amounts of federal land to determine the level of cooperation and compliance by the federal government with this article.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 773, § 16, effective May 23.

35-5.5-115. Rules.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules as necessary to carry out the purposes of this article, which rules shall include a designation of state noxious weeds.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 773, § 17, effective May 23.

35-5.5-116. Noxious weed management fund - creation - allocation of funds.

There is hereby created in the office of the state treasurer the noxious weed management fund. The fund consists of any civil penalties collected pursuant to section 35-5.5-118; any gifts, donations, and grants received pursuant to section 35-1-104 (1)(cc); and any moneys appropriated or transferred thereto by the general assembly. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. The general assembly shall annually appropriate state moneys in the fund to the department of agriculture for the purposes specified in this section. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys from an appropriation from the fund remain available for expenditure by the department in the next fiscal year without further appropriation.

The interest earned on moneys in the noxious weed management fund and appropriated to the department of agriculture shall be expended for costs incurred by the department of agriculture in administering this article, and any moneys appropriated that exceed the amount needed for such costs may be expended for noxious weed management projects in accordance with this section.

The department may expend moneys through grants or contracts to communities, weed control districts, or other entities it considers appropriate for noxious weed management projects.

The department may expend moneys for the following purposes:

Noxious weed management programs with local weed control districts, if expenses are shared with such districts;

With the approval of the agricultural commission, the department may make special grants to local weed control districts to eradicate or contain state noxious weeds, which grants may be issued without matching funds from the district;

Administrative expenses incurred by the department;

Any project the agricultural commission determines will significantly contribute to the management of noxious weeds within the state;

With the approval of the agricultural commission, grants to the Colorado state university cooperative extension service, the Colorado state university experiment station, and universities for weed management research, evaluation, and education;

Employment of a new and innovative noxious weed management project or the development, implementation, or demonstration of any noxious weed management project that may be proposed, implemented, or established by local, state, or national organizations, whether public or private. Such expenditures shall be shared with such organizations.

If a new and potentially harmful noxious weed is discovered growing in the state and its presence is verified by the department, the governor may declare a noxious weed emergency. In the absence of necessary funding from other sources, the department is authorized to allocate up to fifty thousand dollars of the principal in the noxious weed management fund to government agencies for emergency relief to manage or confine the new noxious weed species.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 773, § 17, effective May 23.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1163), ch. 76, p. 199, § 1, effective April 12.

35-5.5-117. The state weed coordinator.

There shall be designated in the department of agriculture a state weed coordinator, who shall be under contract with or appointed by the commissioner.

The state weed coordinator shall:

Develop a recommended management plan for the integrated management of designated noxious weeds within state-owned lands;

Facilitate cooperation between federal, state, and local land managers in the formation of a memorandum of understanding;

Provide guidance and coordination for local governmental weed managers.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 773, § 17, effective May 23.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 881, § 1, effective June 1.

35-5.5-118. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates this article or any rule adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner. The penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation; except that such penalty may be doubled if it is determined that the person has violated the provision or rule more than once. No civil penalty shall be imposed unless and until the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

In addition to any civil penalties assessed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), any person who violates the provisions of section 35-5.5-104.5, 35-5.5-108, or 35-5.5-108.5, or any rule adopted to implement these sections, shall, upon an order of the commissioner, pay the cost of inspection and eradication of list A or list B noxious weed species, including, but not limited to, any immediate remediation costs, the estimated cost of future eradication, any administrative costs, and any court cost and attorney fees incurred by the commissioner in enforcing section 35-5.5-104.5, 35-5.5-108, or 35-5.5-108.5, or any rule adopted to implement these sections. The commissioner may not enforce such order unless and until the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. All moneys due and owing pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be payable to the department for the payment and reimbursement of enforcement and costs associated with such enforcement and are hereby continuously appropriated to the department for such purpose.

If the commissioner is unable to collect a civil penalty, payment of costs imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or if the person fails to pay all or a specified portion of such penalty or payment, the department may bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees.

Before imposing any civil penalty or payment of costs, the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty or payment of costs on the ability of the person charged to stay in business.

All civil penalties and payment of costs collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the noxious weed management fund created in section 35-5.5-116.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 773, § 17, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2425, § 5, effective August 6.

35-5.5-119. County funding.

The board of county commissioners is authorized to levy a special tax, subject to the approval of the voters, upon every dollar of valuation of assessment of taxable property within the county for the purpose of creating a county fund to control noxious weeds; except that the amount raised from such levy in any one year shall not exceed the amount raised by five mills.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 773, § 17, effective May 23.